California, session 20252026, AB1558.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 7.7 (commencing with Section 8599.5) is added to Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 7.7. Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act8599.5. This article may be cited as the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act.8599.51. For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Disaster relief organization” means an entity that provides emergency or disaster relief services that include health or veterinary services provided by volunteer health practitioners and that meets either of the following requirements:(1) It is designated or recognized as a provider of those services pursuant to a disaster response and recovery plan adopted by an agency of the federal government or the Emergency Medical Services Authority.(2) It regularly plans and conducts its activities in coordination with an agency of the federal government or the Emergency Medical Services Authority.(b) “Emergency” means an event or condition that is a state of emergency proclaimed pursuant to Section 8588 or 8625, a local emergency proclaimed pursuant to Section 8630, a health emergency proclaimed pursuant to Section 101080 of the Health and Safety Code, or a state of war.(c) “Emergency declaration” means a proclamation of emergency issued pursuant to Section 8588, 8625, or 8630, a declaration of health emergency pursuant to Section 101080 of the Health and Safety Code, or a declaration of war by the United States.(d) “Emergency Management Assistance Compact” means the interstate compact approved by Congress by Public Law No. 104-321 and ratified in Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 179) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 1.(e) “Entity” means a person other than an individual.(f) “Health facility” means an entity licensed under the laws of this or another state to provide health or veterinary services.(g) “Health practitioner” means an individual licensed under the laws of this or another state to provide health or veterinary services.(h) “Health services” means the provision of treatment, care, advice, or guidance, or other services, or supplies, related to the health or death of individuals or human populations, to the extent necessary to respond to an emergency, including all of the following:(1) Services or supplies concerning the physical or mental condition or functional status of an individual or affecting the structure or function of the body, including the following:(A) Preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, maintenance, or palliative care.(B) Counseling, assessment, procedures, or other services.(2) The sale or dispensing of a drug, a device, equipment, or another item to an individual in accordance with a prescription.(3) Funeral, cremation, cemetery, or other mortuary services.(i) “Host entity” means an entity operating in this state that uses volunteer health practitioners to respond to an emergency.(j) “License” means authorization by a state to engage in health or veterinary services that are unlawful without the authorization. The term includes authorization under the laws of California to provide health or veterinary services based upon a national certification issued by a public or private entity.(k) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.(l) “Scope of practice” means the extent of the authorization to provide health or veterinary services granted to a health practitioner by a license issued to the practitioner in the state in which the principal part of the practitioner’s services is rendered, including any conditions imposed by the licensing authority in that state.(m) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.(n) “Veterinary services” means the provision of treatment, care, advice or guidance, or other services or supplies, related to the health or death of an animal or to animal populations, to the extent necessary to respond to an emergency, including all of the following:(1) Diagnosis, treatment, or prevention of an animal disease, injury, or other physical or mental condition by the prescription, administration, or dispensing of vaccine, medicine, surgery, or therapy.(2) Use of a procedure for reproductive management.(3) Monitoring and treatment of animal populations for diseases that have spread or demonstrate the potential to spread to humans.(o) “Volunteer health practitioner” means a health practitioner who provides health or veterinary services, whether or not the practitioner receives compensation for those services. “Volunteer health practitioner” does not include a practitioner who receives compensation pursuant to a preexisting employment relationship with a host entity or affiliate that requires the practitioner to provide health services in this state, unless the practitioner is not a resident of this state and is employed by a disaster relief organization providing services in this state while an emergency declaration is in effect.8599.52. This article applies to volunteer health practitioners registered with a registration system that complies with Section 8599.54 and who provide health or veterinary services in this state for a host entity while an emergency declaration is in effect.8599.53. (a) While an emergency declaration is in effect, the Emergency Medical Services Authority may limit, restrict, or otherwise regulate all of the following:(1) The duration of practice by volunteer health practitioners.(2) The geographical areas in which volunteer health practitioners may practice.(3) The types of volunteer health practitioners who may practice.(4) Any other matters necessary to coordinate effectively the provision of health or veterinary services during the emergency.(b) An order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) may take effect immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a regulation within the meaning of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3).(c) A host entity that uses volunteer health practitioners to provide health or veterinary services in this state shall do both of the following:(1)  Coordinate its activities with the Emergency Medical Services Authority to the extent practicable to provide for the efficient and effective use of volunteer health practitioners.(2) Comply with any laws other than this article relating to the management of emergency health or veterinary services.(d) The Emergency Medical Services Authority shall coordinate its activities under this section with the Office of Emergency Services to ensure that any deployment of volunteer health practitioners is consistent with the standardized emergency management system, established pursuant to Section 8607.8599.54. (a) To qualify as a volunteer health practitioner registration system, a system shall do all of the following:(1) Accept applications for the registration of volunteer health practitioners before or during an emergency.(2) Include information about the licensure and good standing of health practitioners that is accessible by authorized persons.(3) Be capable of supplying sufficient information about registered volunteer health practitioners to the Emergency Medical Services Authority, or a similar designated agency, in order to allow that authority or agency to confirm the accuracy of information concerning whether a health practitioner is licensed and in good standing before health services or veterinary services are provided under this article.(4) Meet at least one of the following conditions:(A) Be an emergency system for advance registration of volunteer health care practitioners established by a state and funded through the Health Resources and Services Administration under Section 319C-2 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 247d-3b).(B) Be a local unit consisting of trained and equipped emergency response, public health, and medical personnel formed pursuant to Section 2813 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300hh-15).(C) Be operated by one of the following:(i) A disaster relief organization.(ii) A licensing board or bureau established pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of, or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 3 of, the Business and Professions Code.(iii) A national, state, or regional association of licensing boards or health practitioners.(iv) A health facility that provides comprehensive inpatient and outpatient health care services, including a tertiary care and teaching hospital.(v) A governmental entity.(D) Be designated by the Emergency Medical Services Authority as a registration system for purposes of this article.(b) While an emergency declaration is in effect, the Emergency Medical Services Authority, a person authorized to act on behalf of the authority, or a host entity may confirm whether volunteer health practitioners utilized in this state are registered with a registration system that complies with subdivision (a). Confirmation is limited to obtaining identities of the practitioners from the system and determining whether the system indicates that the practitioners are licensed and in good standing.(c) Upon request of a person in this state authorized to manage the emergency response, or a similarly authorized person in another state, a registration system located in this state shall notify the person of the identities of volunteer health practitioners and whether the practitioners are licensed and in good standing.(d) A host entity is not required to use the services of a volunteer health practitioner even if the practitioner is registered with a registration system that indicates that the practitioner is licensed and in good standing.8599.55. (a) While an emergency declaration is in effect, a volunteer health practitioner, registered with a registration system that complies with Section 8599.54 and licensed and in good standing in the state in which the practitioner’s registration is based, may practice in this state to the extent authorized by this article as if the practitioner were licensed in this state.(b) A volunteer health practitioner qualified under subdivision (a) is not entitled to the protections of this article if the practitioner is licensed in more than one state and any license of the practitioner is suspended, revoked, or subject to an order limiting or restricting practice privileges, or has been voluntarily terminated under threat of sanction.(c) Nothing in this article is intended to modify the licensing requirements imposed on any health practitioner by licensing or regulatory provisions contained in Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or by any other laws or regulations of this state, in the absence of an emergency declaration, as that term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 8599.51.8599.56. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Credentialing” means obtaining, verifying, and assessing the qualifications of a health practitioner to provide treatment, care, or services in or for a health facility.(2) “Privileging” means the authorizing by an appropriate authority, such as a governing body, of a health practitioner to provide specific treatment, care, or services at a health facility subject to limits based on factors that include license, education, training, experience, competence, health status, and specialized skill.(b) This article does not affect credentialing or privileging standards of a health facility and does not preclude a health facility from waiving or modifying those standards while an emergency declaration is in effect.8599.57. (a)  Except as further limited by subdivisions (b) and (c), a volunteer health practitioner shall adhere to the scope of practice for a similarly licensed practitioner established by the licensing provisions, practice acts, or other laws of this state.(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), this article does not authorize a volunteer health practitioner to provide services that are outside the practitioner’s scope of practice, even if a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would be permitted to provide the services.(c) The applicable licensing board or bureau may restrict or may, consistent with the limitations set forth in subdivision (a), modify the health services or veterinary services regulated by that body that volunteer health practitioners may provide pursuant to this article. An order under this subdivision may take effect immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a regulation within the meaning of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3).(d) A host entity may restrict the health or veterinary services that a volunteer health practitioner may provide pursuant to this article.(e) A volunteer health practitioner shall not be found to have engaged in unauthorized practice unless the practitioner has reason to know of any limitation, modification, or restriction under this section or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide the services. A volunteer health practitioner has reason to know of a limitation, modification, or restriction or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide a service if either:(1) The practitioner knows the limitation, modification, or restriction exists or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide the service.(2) From all the facts and circumstances known to the practitioner at the relevant time, a reasonable person would conclude that the limitation, modification, or restriction exists or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide the service.(f) In addition to the authority granted by the laws of this state, other than this article, to regulate the conduct of health practitioners, a licensing board or other disciplinary authority in this state has the following powers and duties:(1) It may impose administrative sanctions upon a health practitioner licensed in this state for conduct outside of this state in response to an out-of-state emergency.(2) It may impose administrative sanctions upon a practitioner not licensed in this state for conduct in this state in response to an in-state emergency.(3) It shall report any administrative sanctions imposed upon a practitioner licensed in another state to the appropriate licensing board or other disciplinary authority in any other state in which the practitioner is known to be licensed.(g) In determining whether to impose administrative sanctions under subdivision (f), a licensing board or other disciplinary authority shall consider the circumstances in which the conduct took place, including any exigent circumstances, and the practitioner’s scope of practice, education, training, experience, and specialized skill.8599.58. This article does not limit rights, privileges, or immunities provided to volunteer health practitioners by laws other than this article.8599.59. A volunteer health practitioner who is providing health or veterinary services in this state pursuant to this article, or who is traveling to or from this state to provide those services, shall be considered an employee of this state for purposes of worker’s compensation coverage concerning any injury, occupational illness, or death incurred by the practitioner in providing the services or in traveling to or from this state to provide the services. Worker’s compensation benefits for volunteer health practitioners are limited to those benefits provided to state employees under the laws of this state.8599.60. The Emergency Medical Services Authority may promulgate rules, after approval by the Commission on Emergency Medical Services, to implement this article. In doing so, the authority shall consult with and consider the recommendations of the entity established to coordinate the implementation of the Emergency Management Assistance Compact and shall also consult with and consider rules promulgated by similarly empowered agencies in other states to promote uniformity of application of this article and make the emergency response systems in the various states reasonably compatible.8599.61. In applying and construing this article, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.